Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1210.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 602-A(a) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.789, No.285), known as The Insurance Department Act of 1921, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 602-A. Powers and duties of department.(a) Responsibilities.--The commissioner shall do all of the following:* * *(3) Approve or contract to approve a program or course of study that prepares candidates for an insurance producer 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 licensing examination. Notwithstanding the provisions of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act, the authority to approve or contract to approve insurance producer preexamination educational courses or programs shall be exclusively vested in and exercised by the commissioner. The approved courses or programs shall be exempt from the requirements of the Private Licensed Schools Act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1210PN1498 - 2 - 12345678910